Hawaii statutes.
[§256B-6] Account funds. Moneys in an
ABLE savings account:

(1) Shall be exempt from attachment, execution, or
garnishment as provided by section 651-124; and

(2) May be claimed by the medicaid plan subject to
limitations imposed by the Secretary. [L 2015, c 206, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next